lb_LU.aff
FLAG long
SFX P0 N 213
SFX P0 n 0 [^n]n
SFX P0 nn 0 nn
SFX P0 ënnen ann ënnen
SFX P0 ënnen anns ënnen
SFX P0 ënnen ënnt ënnen
SFX P0 ënnen onnten/V0 ënnen
SFX P0 ënnen éint ënnen
SFX P0 ënnen éinten/V0 ënnen
SFX P0 annen ënns annen
SFX P0 annen ënnt annen
SFX P0 annen annt annen
SFX P0 uelen ils bezuelen
SFX P0 uelen ilt bezuelen
SFX P0 en t bezuelen
SFX P0 den t estueden
SFX P0 ueden iits estueden
SFX P0 ueden it estueden
SFX P0 wen ft bleiwen
SFX P0 wen fs bleiwen
SFX P0 eiwen ouf bleiwen
SFX P0 eiwen oufen/f0 bleiwen
SFX P0 eiwen ouwen/V0 bleiwen
SFX P0 eiwen éif bleiwen
SFX P0 eiwen éifen/f0 bleiwen
SFX P0 eiwen éiwen/V0 bleiwen
SFX P0 sen ost blosen
SFX P0 osen éis blosen
SFX P0 osen éist blosen
SFX P0 en s bréngen
SFX P0 en t bréngen
SFX P0 éngen uecht bréngen
SFX P0 éngen uechten/V0 bréngen
SFX P0 ngen ichten/V0 bréngen
SFX P0 enken uechten/V0 denken
SFX P0 len alt falen
SFX P0 alen ält falen
SFX P0 alen äls falen
SFX P0 alen éil falen
SFX P0 alen éilen/V0 falen
SFX P0 alen oul falen
SFX P0 alen oulen/V0 falen
SFX P0 ueren iers fueren
SFX P0 ueren iert fueren
SFX P0 en t fueren
SFX P0 inn äis sinn
SFX P0 inn äit sinn
SFX P0 nn tt [gs]inn
SFX P0 inn ouch sinn
SFX P0 inn ouchen/V0 sinn
SFX P0 inn éich sinn
SFX P0 inn éichen/V0 sinn
SFX P0 en ots froen
SFX P0 en t froen
SFX P0 en ten/f0 froen
SFX P0 en t [djs]oen
SFX P0 en s [js]oen
SFX P0 en ten/f0 soen
SFX P0 oen éit [hd][lr]oen
SFX P0 oen éis [hd][lr]oen
SFX P0 en t [hd][lr]oen
SFX P0 en ungen/V0 [dtg]oen
SFX P0 en ung [dtg]oen
SFX P0 oen éingen/V0 [dtg]oen
SFX P0 oen éing [dtg]oen
SFX P0 oen i [dtg]oen
SFX P0 oen inn [dtg]oen
SFX P0 oen itt [dtg]oen
SFX P0 oen ees [^d][rt]oen
SFX P0 oen eet [^d][rt]oen
SFX P0 oen ees [dgjs]oen
SFX P0 oen eet [dgjs]oen
SFX P0 inn ëss ginn
SFX P0 inn ëtt ginn
SFX P0 inn ouf ginn
SFX P0 inn oufen/V0 ginn
SFX P0 inn éif ginn
SFX P0 inn éifen/V0 ginn
SFX P0 aen ees haen
SFX P0 aen eet haen
SFX P0 aen at haen
SFX P0 wen ft gruewen
SFX P0 wen fs gruewen
SFX P0 uewen iefs gruewen
SFX P0 uewen ieft gruewen
SFX P0 alen äls halen
SFX P0 alen ält halen
SFX P0 len alt halen
SFX P0 alen oul halen
SFX P0 alen oulen/V0 halen
SFX P0 alen éil halen
SFX P0 alen éilen/V0 halen
SFX P0 änken oung hänken
SFX P0 änken oungen/V0 hänken
SFX P0 änken éing hänken
SFX P0 änken éingen/V0 hänken
SFX P0 eeschen ousch eeschen
SFX P0 eeschen ouschen/V0 eeschen
SFX P0 uelen ëls huelen
SFX P0 uelen ëlt huelen
SFX P0 en t huelen
SFX P0 nn et hunn
SFX P0 nn es hunn
SFX P0 nn tt hunn
SFX P0 unn at hunn
SFX P0 unn as hunn
SFX P0 unn ate hunn
SFX P0 unn aten hunn
SFX P0 unn ätt hunn
SFX P0 unn äss hunn
SFX P0 unn ätte hunn
SFX P0 unn ätten hunn
SFX P0 iessen ësst iessen
SFX P0 iessen ëss iessen
SFX P0 en t iessen
SFX P0 iessen éissen/V0 iessen
SFX P0 afen eefs afen
SFX P0 afen eeft afen
SFX P0 afen aaft afen
SFX P0 ammen ëmms ammen
SFX P0 ammen ëmmt ammen
SFX P0 en t ammen
SFX P0 en 0 kommen
SFX P0 ommen ënns kommen
SFX P0 ommen ënnt kommen
SFX P0 en t kommen
SFX P0 mmen um kommen
SFX P0 mmen umen/V0 kommen
SFX P0 ommen éim kommen
SFX P0 ommen éimen/V0 kommen
SFX P0 éien iss kréien
SFX P0 éien it kréien
SFX P0 éien iten/f0 kréien
SFX P0 éien iits kréien
SFX P0 éien ut kréien
SFX P0 éien us kréien
SFX P0 éien uuts kréien
SFX P0 éien uten/f0 kréien
SFX P0 en t [hl]eien
SFX P0 eien éich leien
SFX P0 eien éichen/V0 leien
SFX P0 eien äis [hl]eien
SFX P0 eien äit [hl]eien
SFX P0 eien ouch leien
SFX P0 eien ouchen/V0 leien
SFX P0 oossen éissen/V0 loossen
SFX P0 en t loossen
SFX P0 en t lousen
SFX P0 en s lousen
SFX P0 en t maachen
SFX P0 aachen écht maachen
SFX P0 aachen échs maachen
SFX P0 aachen ouch maachen
SFX P0 aachen ouchen/V0 maachen
SFX P0 aachen éich maachen
SFX P0 aachen éichen/V0 maachen
SFX P0 den t roden
SFX P0 oden éit roden
SFX P0 oden éits roden
SFX P0 uffen iffs uffen
SFX P0 uffen ifft uffen
SFX P0 en t uffen
SFX P0 fen oft schlofen
SFX P0 ofen éifs schlofen
SFX P0 ofen éift schlofen
SFX P0 en t angen
SFX P0 angen éngt angen
SFX P0 angen éngs angen
SFX P0 en 0 sëtzen
SFX P0 en t sëtzen
SFX P0 ëtzen ouzen/V0 sëtzen
SFX P0 ëtzen éizen/V0 sëtzen
SFX P0 iechen écht iechen
SFX P0 iechen échs iechen
SFX P0 en t iechen
SFX P0 iechen ouch stiechen
SFX P0 iechen ouchen/V0 stiechen
SFX P0 iechen éich stiechen
SFX P0 iechen éichen/V0 stiechen
SFX P0 en t stoussen
SFX P0 oussen éissen/V0 ussen
SFX P0 effen ëffs effen
SFX P0 effen ëfft effen
SFX P0 effen efft effen
SFX P0 den t trieden
SFX P0 ieden ëts trieden
SFX P0 ieden ëtt trieden
SFX P0 ëllen ollten/V0 wëllen
SFX P0 ëllen éilten/V0 wëllen
SFX P0 erfen ërfs werfen
SFX P0 erfen ërft werfen
SFX P0 erfen erft werfen
SFX P0 en t saufen
SFX P0 aufen ëfs saufen
SFX P0 aufen ëft saufen
SFX P0 aufen äifs saufen
SFX P0 aufen äift saufen
SFX P0 en t wuessen
SFX P0 uessen iiss wuessen
SFX P0 uessen iisst wuessen
SFX P0 éien itt éien
SFX P0 éien itts [^hr]éien
SFX P0 éien ouch schéien
SFX P0 éien ouchen/f0 schéien
SFX P0 otmen tems ootmen
SFX P0 otmen temt ootmen
SFX P0 nen ent [dfgh]nen
SFX P0 nen ens [dfgh]nen
SFX P0 aken écks paken
SFX P0 aken éckt paken
SFX P0 uelen éilen/V0 [^e]huelen
SFX P0 uelen éil [^e]huelen
SFX P0 en s geheien
SFX P0 oen éiten/V0 doen

SFX V0 N 18
SFX V0 n 0 .
SFX V0 en s [^djrswxz]en
SFX V0 en t [^djrtw]en
SFX V0 den ts [^d]den
SFX V0 den t [^d]den
SFX V0 dden tts dden
SFX V0 dden tt dden
SFX V0 en s [^äio]ren
SFX V0 en t [^äio]ren
SFX V0 ren ers [äio]ren
SFX V0 ren ert [äio]ren
SFX V0 ën s ën
SFX V0 ën t ën
SFX V0 jen chs jen
SFX V0 jen cht jen
SFX V0 wen fs wen
SFX V0 wen ft wen
SFX V0 en 0 [stxz]en

SFX v0 N 6
SFX v0 ën 0 ën
SFX v0 en 0 [^djw]en
SFX v0 den t [^d]den
SFX v0 dden tt dden
SFX v0 wen f wen
SFX v0 jen ch jen

SFX p0 N 8
SFX p0 nen en nen
SFX p0 nen e nen
SFX p0 otmen tem men
SFX p0 oen éi oen
SFX p0 inn ëff ginn
SFX p0 unn ief unn
SFX p0 inn éi sinn
SFX p0 apten p behaapten

SFX V1 N 77
SFX V1 n 0 .
SFX V1 ben abs aben
SFX V1 ben abt aben
SFX V1 fen afs afen
SFX V1 fen aft afen
SFX V1 gen ags agen
SFX V1 gen agt agen
SFX V1 gen ägs ägen
SFX V1 gen ägt ägen
SFX V1 ken aks aken
SFX V1 ken akt aken
SFX V1 len als alen
SFX V1 len alt alen
SFX V1 len äls älen
SFX V1 len ält älen
SFX V1 men ams amen
SFX V1 men amt amen
SFX V1 men äms ämen
SFX V1 men ämt ämen
SFX V1 nen ans anen
SFX V1 nen ant anen
SFX V1 nen äns änen
SFX V1 nen änt änen
SFX V1 pen aps apen
SFX V1 pen apt apen
SFX V1 ren ars aren
SFX V1 ren art aren
SFX V1 sen ast asen
SFX V1 sen äst äsen
SFX V1 ven avs aven
SFX V1 ven avt aven
SFX V1 zen azt azen
SFX V1 ben ibs iben
SFX V1 ben ibt iben
SFX V1 ken iks iken
SFX V1 ken ikt iken
SFX V1 len ils ilen
SFX V1 len ilt ilen
SFX V1 zen izt izen
SFX V1 ben obs oben
SFX V1 ben obt oben
SFX V1 den öts öden
SFX V1 fen ofs ofen
SFX V1 fen oft ofen
SFX V1 ken oks oken
SFX V1 ken okt oken
SFX V1 len ols olen
SFX V1 len olt olen
SFX V1 sen ost osen
SFX V1 men oms omen
SFX V1 men omt omen
SFX V1 nen ons onen
SFX V1 nen ont onen
SFX V1 pen ops open
SFX V1 pen opt open
SFX V1 zen ozt ozen
SFX V1 fen uft ufen
SFX V1 fen ufs ufen
SFX V1 pen upt upen
SFX V1 pen ups upen
SFX V1 sen ust usen
SFX V1 ten uts uten
SFX V1 zen uzt uzen
SFX V1 ben übs üben
SFX V1 ben übt üben
SFX V1 gen ügs ügen
SFX V1 gen ügt ügen
SFX V1 sen üst üsen
SFX V1 en 0 [stxz]en
SFX V1 den t den
SFX V1 nen öns önen
SFX V1 nen önt önen
SFX V1 den its iden
SFX V1 ren ors oren
SFX V1 ren ort oren
SFX V1 pen ips ipen
SFX V1 pen ipt ipen

PFX g0 Y 1
PFX g0 0 ge .

SFX G0 Y 5
SFX G0 en t/g0 [^tf]en
SFX G0 en t/g0 [^ao]fen
SFX G0 fen aft/g0 afen
SFX G0 fen oft/g0 ofen
SFX G0 en 0/g0 ten

SFX U0 N 5
SFX U0 0 er/F6 [^se]
SFX U0 0 ser/F6 [^s]s
SFX U0 0 er/F6 ss
SFX U0 0 r/F6 [^e]e
SFX U0 0 ër/F6 ee
