lb_LU.dic
aliteréieren/V0v0 po:verb
Antoniushaff/U0
antreffen/P0s0 po:verb
anüben/V1s0 po:verb
aprägen/V1s0 po:verb
asalzen/V0s0 po:verb
assimiléieren/V0v0 po:verb
ausfriessen/P0s0 po:verb
auskennen/V0s0 po:verb
auskrazen/V1s0 po:verb
ausprägen/V1s0 po:verb
ausüben/V1s0 po:verb
auswuchten/V0s0 po:verb
auswuessen/P0s0 po:verb
Bartreng/U0
beamen/V0v0G0 po:verb
bedalen/v0V1 po:verb
begléckwënschen/V0v0 po:verb
begoen/P0p0 po:verb
begruewen/P0v0 po:verb
behaapten/p0P1 po:verb
Bëlschdref/U0
beootmen/P0p0 po:verb
bepaken/P0v0V1 po:verb
berechnen/P0p0 po:verb
berotschloen/P0p0 po:verb
beschreiwen/V0v0 po:verb
beschwieren/V0v0 po:verb
bestoen/P0p0 po:verb
bestrofen/v0V1 po:verb
bewaffnen/P0p0 po:verb
bezeechnen/P0p0 po:verb
Biekerech/U0
Bill/U0
bleechen/V0v0G0 po:verb
bleiwen/P0v0 po:verb
bombéieren/V0v0 po:verb
botzen/V0v0G0 po:verb
Boukels/U0
boykottéieren/V0v0 po:verb
Brosiushaff/U0
brutschelen/V0v0G0 po:verb
Bus/U0
charteren/V0v0G0 po:verb
confederéieren/V0v0 po:verb
consultéieren/V0v0 po:verb
crèmen/V0v0G0 po:verb
deichselen/V0v0G0 po:verb
deliberéieren/V0v0 po:verb
demoraliséieren/V0v0 po:verb
dervukommen/P0s0 po:verb
distilléieren/V0v0 po:verb
donieftbehuelen/P0s0 po:verb
Dräibur/U0
drängen/V0v0G0 po:verb
dréchnen/P0p0 po:verb
droen/P0v0 po:verb
dropklaken/V1s0 po:verb
dübelen/V0v0G0 po:verb
duerchgoen/P0s0 po:verb
duzen/v0V1 po:verb
ëmdenken/P0V0s0 po:verb
ëmdrécken/V0s0 po:verb
ëmgoen/P0p0s0 po:verb
encadréieren/V0v0 po:verb
ënnergruewen/P0v0s0 po:verb
ënnerhaken/V1s0 po:verb
ënnerstoen/P0p0 po:verb
enteegnen/P0p0 po:verb
Enteschbaach/U0
entflamen/v0V1 po:verb
entsprangen/P0v0 po:verb
entstoen/P0p0 po:verb
entwutzen/V0v0 po:verb
erareechen/V0s0 po:verb
erausbréngen/P0s0 po:verb
erauszéien/P0s0 po:verb
erëmkréien/P0s0 po:verb
erginn/P0p0 po:verb
erkalen/v0V1 po:verb
erofklammen/P0s0 po:verb
erofrennen/V0s0 po:verb
erstoen/P0p0 po:verb
ertappen/V0v0 po:verb
erugoen/P0s0 po:verb
erwänen/v0V1 po:verb
ewechhuelen/P0s0 po:verb
falsetéieren/V0v0 po:verb
falsifizéieren/V0v0 po:verb
fécken/V0v0G0 po:verb
Fielsmillen/U0
flätschen/V0v0G0 po:verb
fléien/P0v0 po:verb
formaliséieren/V0v0 po:verb
fortschafen/V1s0 po:verb
friessen/P0v0G0 po:verb
fuschen/V0v0G0 po:verb
futtigoen/P0s0 po:verb
gängelen/V0v0G0 po:verb
Géidgen/U0
gestoen/P0p0 po:verb
gewäerden/V0v0 po:verb
goen/P0p0 po:verb
gonfléieren/V0v0 po:verb
grätschen/V0v0G0 po:verb
Grenzen/U0
Héienhaff/U0
hiklaken/V1s0 po:verb
hinhalen/P0s0 po:verb
Hoen/U0
hosten/V0v0G0 po:verb
huelen/P0v0P1 po:verb
hunn/P0p0 po:verb
Iischpelt/U0
institutionaliséieren/V0v0 po:verb
iwwerfléien/P0v0 po:verb
iwwersinn/P0p0 po:verb
kämmen/V0v0G0 po:verb
keilen/V0v0G0 po:verb
kennzeechnen/P0p0 po:verb
Këppenhaff/U0
klicken/V0v0 po:verb
klirren/V0v0G0 po:verb
klonen/v0V1 po:verb
kniwwelen/V0v0 po:verb
Krautem/U0
krichen/V0v0G0 po:verb
kriselen/V0v0G0 po:verb
latexéieren/V0v0 po:verb
laueren/V0v0G0 po:verb
leien/P0v0 po:verb
Léiweng/U0
luppen/V0v0 po:verb
Marbuerg/U0
Miesdref/U0
mobben/V0v0G0 po:verb
nammen/V0v0 po:verb
Neimillen/U0
noafen/V1s0 po:verb
noäiferen/V0s0 po:verb
ofdréchnen/P0s0 po:verb
ofquälen/V1s0 po:verb
ofseefen/V0s0 po:verb
ootmen/P0p0 po:verb
opjoen/P0s0 po:verb
opschnapen/V1s0 po:verb
Ouljen/U0
panéieren/V0v0 po:verb
penaliséieren/V0v0 po:verb
pokeren/V0v0G0 po:verb
priedegen/V0v0 po:verb
pupen/v0V1 po:verb
Raemerech/U0
ralliéieren/V0v0 po:verb
reaffiliéieren/V0v0 po:verb
rechnen/P0p0 po:verb
rengegen/V0v0G0 po:verb
reproduzéieren/V0v0 po:verb
Roudenhaff/U0
saften/V0v0G0 po:verb
schmotzen/V0v0G0 po:verb
schnapen/v0V1 po:verb
Schraasseg/U0
schwäermen/V0v0 po:verb
sniffen/V0v0G0 po:verb
soupçonnéieren/V0v0 po:verb
Steenem/U0
subliméieren/V0v0 po:verb
taseren/V0v0G0 po:verb
topen/v0V1 po:verb
traktéieren/V0v0 po:verb
ubleiwen/P0s0 po:verb
uerdnen/P0p0 po:verb
uerteelen/V0v0G0 po:verb
Uewereesbech/U0
unzapen/V1s0 po:verb
usuckelen/V0s0 po:verb
verblöden/v0V1 po:verb
verdäitlechen/V0v0 po:verb
verginn/P0p0 po:verb
verharmlosen/v0V1 po:verb
verkuerbelen/V0v0 po:verb
verleegnen/P0p0 po:verb
vernaschelen/V0v0 po:verb
verschiben/v0V1 po:verb
versinn/P0p0 po:verb
veruerdnen/P0p0 po:verb
verzerren/V0v0 po:verb
virspanen/V1s0 po:verb
virspriechen/P0s0 po:verb
vrecken/V0v0 po:verb
Wandhaff/U0
widderstoen/P0p0 po:verb
wieren/V0v0G0 po:verb
wuppen/V0v0G0 po:verb
zeechnen/P0p0 po:verb
Zéisseng/U0
zeréckfueren/P0s0 po:verb
zerécksetzen/V0s0 po:verb
zerstralen/v0V1 po:verb
zougeheien/P0s0 po:verb
